Utah statutes.
76-6-103.   Aggravated arson.

(1)  A person is guilty of aggravated arson if by means of fire or explosives he intentionally and unlawfully damages:

(a)  a habitable structure; or

(b)  any structure or vehicle when any person not a participant in the offense is in the structure or vehicle.

(2)  Aggravated arson is a felony of the first degree.



Amended by Chapter 59, 1986 General Session

